Washington statutes.
RCW 43.167.003

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Community" means a group of people who reside or work in the geographic area established by the community preservation and development authority board or the proposal to create the authority and who currently or historically share a distinct cultural identity or local history.

(2) "Community preservation and development authority" or "authority" means a public body corporate and politic and instrumentality of the state of Washington created by members of an impacted community.

(3) "Constituency" means the general membership of the community preservation and development authority, which membership must be open to all persons eighteen years of age and over who are residents, property owners, employees, or business persons within the geographic boundaries established by the authority or the proposal to create the authority.

(4) "Impacted community" means a community that has been adversely impacted by the construction of, or ongoing operation of, multiple major public facilities, public works, and capital projects with significant public funding or by other land use decisions.

(5) "Major public facilities project, public works project, or capital project with significant public funding" means any capital project whose total cost exceeds ten million dollars. On July 1, 2019, and on July 1st of each odd-numbered year thereafter, the capital project cost threshold must be adjusted by the capital project cost adjustment factor for inflation established by the office of financial management.

[ 2021 c 47 s 1; 2019 c 447 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 447: See note following RCW 43.167.007.